Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1510
Fiduciary capacity, defined.

Fiduciary capacity shall mean an undertaking to act as executor, administrator, personal representative, guardian, conservator, or receiver.

Laws 1981, LB 9, § 4.